New Jersey, session 221, S275.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    As used in P.L.    , c.     (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill): "Airport" means a designated area of land, water, or both, which is licensed by the Department of Transportation for the landing and takeoff of airplanes and other aircraft, and which may provide facilities for shelter, security, and service of aircraft. "Emergency medical transportation" shall have the same meaning as provided in section 1 of P.L.1986, c.106 (C.26:2K-35). Helicopter means a rotary wing aircraft that depends principally upon the lift generated by engine-driven rotors rotating on a substantially vertical axis for its primary means of propulsion. "Heliport" means a dedicated area of defined dimensions, either at ground level or elevated on a structure, designated for the landing or takeoff of helicopters and used solely for that purpose. "Helistop" means an area of defined dimensions, either at ground level or elevated on a structure designated for the landing or take off of helicopters, but not limited in use to that sole purpose. 1News agency means a commercial organization that collects and supplies news to subscribing newspapers, magazines, periodicals, and news broadcasters.1 2.    1[The] a.  To the extent permitted by federal law, the1 Commissioner of Transportation shall adopt, pursuant to the "Administrative Procedure Act," P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), rules and regulations to reduce the noise generated by helicopters at airports, heliports, and helistops licensed by the State.  These rules and regulations shall include, but need not be limited to, requirements that the proprietor of an airport, heliport, or helistop reduce the number of helicopters leaving the airport, heliport, or helistop by not less than 47 percent 1[per weekday]1 compared to the average number of helicopter flights 1[per weekday]1 leaving from the airport, heliport, or helistop for the 12 months preceding the date of enactment of P.L.      , c.     (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill).  Flights by 1: (1)1 helicopters owned or operated by a federal or military authority 1[or] ;1 the State 1[government] or a political subdivision thereof; a news agency; or a licensed hospital or healthcare provider;1 and 1(2)1 helicopters providing emergency medical transportation shall not be included in the required reduction in helicopter flights. 1b. To the extent permitted by federal law, the Commissioner of Transportation shall require a person applying for a license or renewing a license to operate a heliport or helistop in this State to certify that the person will prohibit helicopters providing sightseeing or tourist services from leaving or landing at the heliport or helistop between the hours of 9:00 p.m. and 8:00 a.m. on weekdays and between the hours of 6:00 p.m. and 10:00 a.m. on weekends.1 3.    This act shall take effect immediately.